Maryland, session 2025, SB0379.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Chapter 228 of the Acts of 2023
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) There is a Workgroup on Social Worker Examination Requirements for
Licensure.
(b) The Workgroup consists of the following members:
(1) one member of the Senate of Maryland who is a member of the
Legislative Black Caucus, appointed by the President of the Senate;
(2) one member of the House of Delegates who is a member of the
Legislative Black Caucus, appointed by the Speaker of the House;
(3) the Secretary of Health, or the Secretary’s designee;
(4) the Secretary of Human Services, or the Secretary’s designee;
(5) the Chair of the State Board of Social Work Examiners, or the Chair’s
designee;
(6) the Chair of the Maryland Commission on Health Equity, or the Chair’s
designee;
(7) the Executive Director of the State Board of Social Work Examiners, or
the Executive Director’s designee;
(8) the Director of the Governor’s Office of the Deaf and Hard of Hearing,
or the Director’s designee;
(9) one social worker who is deaf or hard of hearing and is familiar with
the licensing process for deaf and hard of hearing social workers, designated by the
Maryland Association of the Deaf;
(10) one representative of the NAACP Maryland State Conference,
designated by the President of the NAACP Maryland State Conference;

SENATE BILL 379 3
(11) one representative of the Baltimore Legacy Chapter of the Association
of Black Social Workers, designated by the Baltimore Legacy Chapter of the Association of
Black Social Workers;
(12) one representative of the Maryland Chapter of the National Association
of Social Workers, designated by the Executive Director of the Maryland Chapter of the
National Association of Social Workers;
(13) one member from the Greater Washington Society for Clinical Social
Work, designated by the President of the Greater Washington Society for Clinical Social
Work;
(14) two representatives of the Association of Social Work Boards,
designated by the President of the Association of Social Work Boards; and
(15) the following members, appointed by the Governor:
(i) three Deans of Social Work from accredited social work master’s
programs serving the State, one of which shall be from a historically Black college or
university;
(ii) three representatives from nongovernmental social service
organizations that primarily work to support Western Maryland, Central Maryland, and
the Eastern Shore; and
(iii) two individuals who received a master’s degree in social work
within the immediately preceding 10 years and who have been negatively impacted by the
examination requirement for licensure under Title 19 of the Health Occupations Article.
(c) The Governor shall designate the chair of the Workgroup.
(d) The Maryland Department of Health shall provide staff for the Workgroup.
(e) A member of the Workgroup:
(1) may not receive compensation as a member of the Workgroup; but
(2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(f) To complete its work as required under this section, the Workgroup may:
(1) establish subgroups; or
(2) contract with an entity with expertise in analyzing assessment bias.
(g) The Workgroup shall:

SENATE BILL 379
(1) determine:
(i) whether to continue to use examinations developed by the
Association of Social Work Boards as a requirement for a bachelor social worker license or
a master social worker license;
(ii) whether to establish a temporary license for applicants for a
bachelor social worker license or a master social worker license who, except for passing an
examination required under Title 19, Subtitle 3 of the Health Occupations Article, meet the
education and experience requirements for a license to practice bachelor social work or
master social work under Title 19 of the Health Occupations Article;
(iii) how supervision may be provided to bachelor social worker
licensees and master social worker licensees at no cost to the licensees;
(iv) if the Workgroup determines under item (i) of this item that the
examinations developed by the Association of Social Work Boards should not be used or
under item (ii) of this item that temporary licenses should be established, whether
additional experience or education requirements are necessary;
(v) a timeline for phasing in any determinations made under item
(i), (ii), (iii), or (iv) of this item; and
(vi) an outline and timeline for conducting the study required in
subsection (h) of this section; and
(2) (i) on or before September 1, 2023, submit a preliminary report of
the findings and recommendations required under item (1)(i) through (iv) of this subsection
to the Senate Finance Committee and the House Health and Government Operations
Committee in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article; and
(ii) on or before December 1, 2023, submit an interim report of the
findings and recommendations required under item (1)(i) through (iv) of this subsection
and the outlines and timelines required under item (1)(v) and (vi) of this subsection to the
Senate Finance Committee and the House Health and Government Operations Committee
in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article.
(h) The Workgroup shall:
(1) examine each type of license established under Title 19 of the Health
Occupations Article by:
(i) conducting a bias analysis of the qualifications for each type of
license;
(ii) determining whether each type of license is necessary;

SENATE BILL 379 5
(iii) identifying alternatives to examination requirements that may
be used to assess an applicant’s qualifications for each type of license;
(iv) considering examination testing options, including the
development of a State–based competency examination, minimum requirements for a
national examination to be approved for State applicants, utilization of ranges of
examination scores, and other policies to ensure a bias–free examination;
(v) identifying barriers in addition to the examination that present
challenges to licensure in the State; and
(vi) identifying the circumstances under which unlicensed
individuals work in State and federal government positions as social workers; and
(2) on or before December 1, 2024, report to the Senate Finance Committee
and the House Health and Government Operations Committee, in accordance with §
2–1257 of the State Government Article, on its:
(i) findings under item (1) of this subsection; and
(ii) recommendations to eliminate bias and make the process for
licensing social workers in the State more fair, diverse, and efficient.
(I) THE WORKGROUP SHALL:
(1) EXAMINE:
(I) ALTERATIONS MADE TO THE EXAMINATION DEVELOPED BY
THE ASSOCIATION OF SOCIAL WORK BOARDS AND IMPLEMENTED BEGINNING IN
2026, INCLUDING THE IMPLEMENTATION OF:
1. THREE–OPTION MULTIPLE CHOICE QUESTIONS;
2. A MODULARIZED EXAM FORMAT ALLOWING TEST
TAKERS TO RETAKE ONLY CONTENT AREAS ON WHICH THE TEST TAKER DID NOT
ACHIEVE A PASSING SCORE;
(II) THE IMPLEMENTATION OF POLICIES BY THE ASSOCIATION
OF SOCIAL WORK BOARDS ALLOWING FOR ACCOMMODATIONS AND
ARRANGEMENTS FOR TEST TAKERS, INCLUDING ACCOMMODATIONS AND
ARRANGEMENTS FOR TEST TAKERS:
1. WITH A DISABILITY OR HEALTH CONDITION; OR
2. WHO USE ENGLISH AS A SECOND LANGUAGE; AND

SENATE BILL 379
(III) THE PROVISION OF TEST–TAKER AND EDUCATOR EXAM
PREPARATION MATERIALS BY THE ASSOCIATION OF SOCIAL WORK BOARDS; AND
(2) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2026, REPORT TO THE SENATE
FINANCE COMMITTEE AND THE HOUSE HEALTH AND GOVERNMENT OPERATIONS
COMMITTEE, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT
ARTICLE, ON:
(I) ITS FINDINGS UNDER ITEM (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION; AND
(II) WHETHER TO CONTINUE TO USE EXAMINATIONS
DEVELOPED BY THE ASSOCIATION OF SOCIAL WORK BOARDS AS A REQUIREMENT
FOR A BACHELOR SOCIAL WORKER LICENSE OR A MASTER SOCIAL WORKER LICENSE.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is an emergency
measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health or safety, has
been passed by a yea and nay vote supported by three–fifths of all the members elected to
each of the two Houses of the General Assembly, and shall take effect from the date it is
enacted. Section 2 of this Act shall remain effective through June 30, [2025] 2027, and, at
the end of June 30, [2025] 2027, Section 2 of this Act, with no further action required by
the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.
Article – Health Occupations
19–201.
There is a State Board of Social Work Examiners in the Department.
19–202.
(a) (1) The Board consists of [12] 14 members.
(2) Of the [12] 14 Board members:
(i) 10 shall be licensed social workers of whom:
1. Subject to paragraph (3) of this subsection, 1 is a licensed
bachelor social worker;
2. Subject to paragraph (3) of this subsection, 1 is a licensed
master social worker at the time of appointment;
3. Subject to paragraph (3) of this subsection, at least 1 is:
A. A licensed certified social worker; or

SENATE BILL 379 7
B. A licensed master social worker who is approved for
independent practice;
4. Subject to paragraph (3) of this subsection, at least 4 are
licensed certified social workers–clinical;
5. 1 is a licensed social worker employed by the Department
of Human Services; and
6. Subject to paragraph (3) of this subsection, 1 is a licensed
social worker who is:
A. Primarily engaged in social worker education at a social
work program accredited by the Council on Social Work Education; and
B. Nominated from a list of names submitted by the deans
and directors of the Maryland Social Work Education Programs; and
(ii) [2] 4 shall be consumer members.
19–301.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this title, an individual shall be:
(1) Licensed by the Board before the individual may practice social work in
this State while representing oneself as a social worker; or
(2) Licensed as a certified social worker–clinical before the individual may
practice clinical social work in this State.
19–302.
(a) To obtain a license, an applicant shall demonstrate to the satisfaction of the
Board that the applicant:
(1) Has submitted a complete written application in the form prescribed by
the Board;
(2) Is at least 18 years old;
(3) Is of good moral character;
[(4) Except as otherwise provided in this title, has successfully passed an
examination or examinations prescribed by the Board pertinent to the license sought;]
[(5)] (4) Has paid all applicable fees specified by the Board;

SENATE BILL 379
[(6)] (5) Has completed a criminal history records check in accordance
with § 19–302.2 of this subtitle at the applicant’s expense; and
[(7)] (6) Has submitted to an examination if required under § 19–302.3 of
this subtitle.
(b) To obtain a bachelor social worker license, an applicant shall:
(1) Meet the requirements of subsection (a) of this section; and
(2) Have received a baccalaureate degree in social work from a program
that is accredited or is a candidate for accreditation by the Council on Social Work
Education or an equivalent organization approved by the Council on Social Work
Education.
(c) To obtain a master social worker license, an applicant shall:
(1) Meet the requirements of subsection (a) of this section; and
(2) Have received a master’s degree from a program that is accredited or is
a candidate for accreditation by the Council on Social Work Education or an equivalent
organization approved by the Council on Social Work Education.
(d) Except as provided in § 19–302.1 of this subtitle, to obtain a certified social
worker license, on or before December 31, 2023, an applicant shall:
(1) Meet the requirements of subsection (a) of this section;
(2) Have received a master’s degree from a program accredited by the
Council on Social Work Education or an equivalent organization approved by the Council
on Social Work Education; [and]
(3) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN THIS TITLE, HAVE
SUCCESSFULLY PASSED AN EXAMINATION OR EXAMINATIONS PRESCRIBED BY THE
BOARD PERTINENT TO THE LICENSE SOUGHT; AND
[(3)] (4) Provide in a form prescribed by the Board, documentation of
having completed 2 years as a licensee with supervised experience of at least 3,000 hours
after receiving the master’s degree with a minimum of 100 hours of periodic face–to–face
supervision in the practice of social work under the terms and conditions that the Board
determines by regulation.
(e) Except as provided in § 19–302.1 of this subtitle, to obtain a certified social
worker–clinical license, an applicant shall:

SENATE BILL 379 9
(1) Meet the requirements of subsection (a) of this section;
(2) Have received a master’s degree in social work and documentation of
completion of 12 academic credits in clinical course work from a program accredited by the
Council on Social Work Education or an equivalent organization approved by the Council
on Social Work Education, with a minimum of 6 of the 12 academic credits obtained in a
master’s degree program; [and]
(3) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN THIS TITLE, HAVE
SUCCESSFULLY PASSED AN EXAMINATION OR EXAMINATIONS PRESCRIBED BY THE
BOARD PERTINENT TO THE LICENSE SOUGHT; AND
[(3)] (4) Provide in a form prescribed by the Board, documentation of
having completed 2 years as a licensee with supervised experience of at least 3,000 hours,
of which 1,500 hours are in face–to–face client contact, after receiving the master’s degree
with a minimum of 100 hours of periodic face–to–face supervision in the assessment,
formulation of a diagnostic impression, and treatment of behavioral health disorders and
other conditions and the provision of psychotherapy under the terms and conditions that
the Board determines by regulation.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October June 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.